Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-204
Invasion of privacy; place person before public in false light.

Any person, firm, or corporation which gives publicity to a matter concerning a natural person that places that person before the public in a false light is subject to liability for invasion of privacy, if:

(1) The false light in which the other was placed would be highly offensive to a reasonable person; and

(2) The actor had knowledge of or acted in reckless disregard as to the falsity of the publicized matter and the false light in which the other would be placed.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 4.

In order to recover for invasion of privacy under this section, the matter must be communicated to the public at large, or to so many persons that the matter must be regarded as substantially certain to become one of public knowledge. Wilkinson v. Methodist, Richard Young Hosp., 259 Neb. 745, 612 N.W.2d 213 (2000).

Essential to a false light invasion of privacy claim is that the publicized matter be false. Schoneweis v. Dando, 231 Neb. 180, 435 N.W.2d 666 (1989).

The gravamen of conduct made actionable by this section is the dissemination of offending material to the public at large, or to so many persons that the matter must be regarded as substantially certain to become one of public knowledge. Schoneweis v. Dando, 231 Neb. 180, 435 N.W.2d 666 (1989).

Truth is a defense to a false light privacy claim. Wadman v. State, 1 Neb. App. 839, 510 N.W.2d 426 (1993).